Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.170

Application of chapter to performance-based contracts for energy equipment.

This chapter shall not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in *RCW 39.35A.020(3), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

[ 1985 c 169 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 39.35A.020 was amended by 2001 c 214 s 18, changing subsection (3) to subsection (4). RCW 39.35A.020 was amended by 2022 c 128 s 2, changing subsection (4) to subsection (6).